Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Revenue Anticipation Notes.

Sec. 29.47.010.
Borrowing in anticipation of revenue.

A municipality that is authorized to incur indebtedness may borrow money to meet appropriations for any fiscal year in anticipation of the collection of the revenues for that year, but all debt so contracted shall be paid before the end of the next fiscal year. Negotiable or nonnegotiable revenue anticipation notes may be issued as evidence of the borrowing.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.020.
Issuance of notes.

A municipality may by ordinance or resolution authorize the issuance of revenue anticipation notes.
The governing body may delegate to its chief fiscal officer the power to issue the notes from time to time under the terms and conditions of the ordinance or resolution that provides for the manner of their sale.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.030.
Issuance of notes in anticipation of state or federal grants.

A municipality, on adoption of a long-range capital improvement budget by ordinance or resolution, may by resolution provide for negotiable or nonnegotiable revenue anticipation notes in an amount not to exceed the total amount of any state or federal grants finally committed for these projects. The notes mature no later than the end of the next fiscal year. The notes may be for single or multiple projects outlined in the adopted capital improvement budget.

If the state or federal grants for capital improvement projects have not been paid to the municipality before maturity of the notes issued in anticipation of the receipt of the revenue, the governing body may issue new notes in order to meet payment of the notes then maturing or may renew the outstanding revenue anticipation notes. New notes issued or renewals of outstanding revenue anticipation notes mature not later than the end of the next fiscal year.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.040.
Priority of repayment.

The payment of the principal and interest on revenue anticipation notes is payable from revenues, and their payment additionally shall be secured by a pledge of the full faith and credit of the municipality issuing them.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)